Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.235.260

Free or reduced-price meals—Student assistance.

If a student has not paid for five or more previous meals, the school shall:

(1) Determine whether the student is categorically eligible for free meals;

(2) If no application has been submitted for the student to determine his or her eligibility for free or reduced-price meals, make no fewer than two attempts to contact the student's parent or guardian to have him or her submit an application; and

(3) Have a principal, assistant principal, or school counselor contact the parent or guardian for the purpose of: (a) Offering assistance with completing an application to determine the student's eligibility for free or reduced-price meals; (b) determining whether there are any household issues that may prevent the student from having sufficient funds for school meals; and (c) offering any appropriate assistance.

[ 2018 c 271 s 3.]

NOTES:

Short title—2018 c 271: See note following RCW 28A.235.250.